North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 5. Maternal and Child Health and Women’s Health.
§ 130A-131.9A.
Investigation to identify lead poisoning hazards.

When the Department learns of confirmed lead poisoning, the Department shall conduct an investigation to identify the lead poisoning hazards to children and pregnant women. The Department shall investigate the residential housing unit where the child
or pregnant woman with confirmed lead poisoning resides. The Department shall also investigate the supplemental addresses of the child or pregnant woman who has confirmed lead poisoning.

(a1)
When the Department learns of an elevated blood lead level, the Department shall, upon informed consent, investigate the residential housing unit where the child or pregnant woman with the elevated blood level
resides. When consent to investigate is denied, the child or pregnant woman with the elevated blood lead level cannot be located, or the child’s parent or guardian fails to respond, the Department shall document the denial
of consent, inability to locate, or failure to respond.

The Department shall also conduct an investigation when it reasonably suspects that a lead poisoning hazard to children or pregnant women exists in a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility occupied, regularly visited, or attended by a child
less than six years of age or a pregnant woman.

In conducting an investigation, the Department may take samples of surface materials, or other materials suspected of containing lead, for analysis and testing. If samples are taken, chemical determination of the lead content of the samples shall be by
atomic absorption spectroscopy or equivalent methods approved by the Department.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 2003-150, s. 4; 2017-57, s. 11E.6(c).

§ 130A-131.9B.
Notification.

Upon determination that a lead poisoning hazard exists, the Department shall give written notice of the lead poisoning hazard to the owner or managing agent of the residential housing unit or child-occupied facility and to all persons residing in, attending,
or regularly visiting the unit or facility. The written notice to the owner or managing agent shall include a list of possible methods of remediation.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 2003-150, s. 5.

§ 130A-131.9C.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Abatement and remediation.

Upon determination that a child less than six years of age or a pregnant woman has a confirmed lead poisoning of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater and that child or pregnant woman resides in a residential housing unit containing lead poisoning hazards,
the Department shall require remediation of the lead poisoning hazards. The Department shall also require remediation of the lead poisoning hazards identified at the supplemental addresses of a child less than six years of age
or a pregnant woman with a confirmed lead poisoning of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater.

When remediation of lead poisoning hazards is required under subsection (a) of this section, the owner or managing agent shall submit a written remediation plan to the Department within 14 days of receipt of the lead poisoning hazard notification and
shall obtain written approval of the plan before initiating remediation activities. The remediation plan shall comply with subsections (g), (h), and (i) of this section.

If the remediation plan submitted fails to meet the requirements of this section, the Department shall issue an order requiring submission of a modified plan. The order shall indicate the modifications that shall be made to the remediation plan and the
date that the plan as modified shall be submitted to the Department.

If the owner or managing agent does not submit a remediation plan within 14 days, the Department shall issue an order requiring submission of a remediation plan within five days of receipt of the order.

The owner or managing agent shall notify the Department and the occupants of the dates of remediation activities at least three days before commencement of the activities.

Remediation of the lead poisoning hazards shall be completed within 60 days of the Department’s approval of the remediation plan. If the remediation activities are not completed within 60 days, the Department shall issue an order requiring completion
of the activities. An owner or managing agent may apply to the Department for an extension of the deadline. The Department may issue an order extending the deadline for 30 days upon proper written application by the owner or managing
agent.

All of the following methods of remediation of lead-based paint hazards are prohibited:

Stripping paint on-site with methylene chloride-based solutions.

Torch or flame burning.

Heating paint with a heat gun above 1,100 degrees Fahrenheit.

Covering with new paint or wallpaper unless all readily accessible lead-based paint has been removed.

Uncontrolled abrasive blasting, machine sanding, or grinding, except when used with High Efficiency Particulate Air (HEPA) exhaust control that removes particles of 0.3 microns or larger from the air at ninety-nine and seven-tenths percent (99.7%) or
greater efficiency.

Uncontrolled waterblasting.

Dry scraping, unless used in conjunction with heat guns, or around electrical outlets, or when treating no more than two square feet on interior surfaces, or no more than 20 square feet on exterior surfaces.

All lead-containing waste and residue shall be removed and disposed of in accordance with applicable federal, State, and local laws and rules. Other substances containing lead that are intended for use by children less than six years of age or pregnant
women and vinyl miniblinds that constitute a lead poisoning hazard shall be removed and disposed of in accordance with applicable federal, State, and local laws and rules.

All remediation plans shall require that the lead poisoning hazards be reduced to the following levels:

Fewer than 40 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on floors.

Fewer than 250 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on interior windowsills, bathtubs, kitchen sinks, and lavatories.

Fewer than 400 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on window troughs.

Fewer than 400 parts per million for lead in bare soil in play areas, gardens, pet sleeping areas, and areas within three feet of the residential housing unit or child-occupied facility. Lead in bare soil in other locations of the yard shall be reduced
to less than 1,200 parts per million.

Fewer than 15 parts per billion for lead in drinking water.

The Department shall verify by visual inspection that the approved remediation plan has been completed. The Department may also verify plan completion by residual lead dust monitoring and soil or drinking water lead level measurement.

(j1)
Compliance with the maintenance standard satisfies the remediation requirements for confirmed lead poisoning cases identified on or after 1 October 1990 as long as all lead poisoning hazards identified on interior
and exterior surfaces are addressed by remediation. Except for owner-occupied residential housing units, continued compliance shall be verified by means of an annual monitoring inspection conducted by the Department. For owner-occupied
residential housing units, continued compliance shall be verified (i) by means of an annual monitoring inspection, (ii) by documentation that no child less than six years of age and no pregnant woman has resided in or regularly
visited the residential housing unit within the past year, or (iii) by documentation that no child less than six years of age and no pregnant woman residing in or regularly visiting the unit has an elevated blood lead level.

Removal of children or pregnant women from the residential housing unit or removal of children from the child-occupied facility shall not constitute remediation if the property continues to be used for a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility.
The remediation requirements imposed in subsection (a) of this section apply so long as the property continues to be used as a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 1998-209, s. 3; 2003-150, s. 6; 2017-57, s. 11E.6(d).

§ 130A-131.9C.
Abatement and remediation.

Upon determination that a child less than six years of age or a pregnant woman has a confirmed lead poisoning of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater and that child or pregnant woman resides in a residential housing unit containing lead poisoning hazards,
the Department shall require remediation of the lead poisoning hazards. The Department shall also require remediation of the lead poisoning hazards identified at the supplemental addresses of a child less than six years of age
or a pregnant woman with a confirmed lead poisoning of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater.

When remediation of lead poisoning hazards is required under subsection (a) of this section, the owner or managing agent shall submit a written remediation plan to the Department within 14 days of receipt of the lead poisoning hazard notification and
shall obtain written approval of the plan before initiating remediation activities. The remediation plan shall comply with subsections (g), (h), and (i) of this section.

If the remediation plan submitted fails to meet the requirements of this section, the Department shall issue an order requiring submission of a modified plan. The order shall indicate the modifications that shall be made to the remediation plan and the
date that the plan as modified shall be submitted to the Department.

If the owner or managing agent does not submit a remediation plan within 14 days, the Department shall issue an order requiring submission of a remediation plan within five days of receipt of the order.

The owner or managing agent shall notify the Department and the occupants of the dates of remediation activities at least three days before commencement of the activities.

Remediation of the lead poisoning hazards shall be completed within 60 days of the Department’s approval of the remediation plan. If the remediation activities are not completed within 60 days, the Department shall issue an order requiring completion
of the activities. An owner or managing agent may apply to the Department for an extension of the deadline. The Department may issue an order extending the deadline for 30 days upon proper written application by the owner or managing
agent.

All of the following methods of remediation of lead-based paint hazards are prohibited:

Stripping paint on-site with methylene chloride-based solutions.

Torch or flame burning.

Heating paint with a heat gun above 1,100 degrees Fahrenheit.

Covering with new paint or wallpaper unless all readily accessible lead-based paint has been removed.

Uncontrolled abrasive blasting, machine sanding, or grinding, except when used with High Efficiency Particulate Air (HEPA) exhaust control that removes particles of 0.3 microns or larger from the air at ninety-nine and seven-tenths percent (99.7%) or
greater efficiency.

Uncontrolled waterblasting.

Dry scraping, unless used in conjunction with heat guns, or around electrical outlets, or when treating no more than two square feet on interior surfaces, or no more than 20 square feet on exterior surfaces.

All lead-containing waste and residue shall be removed and disposed of in accordance with applicable federal, State, and local laws and rules. Other substances containing lead that are intended for use by children less than six years of age or pregnant
women and vinyl miniblinds that constitute a lead poisoning hazard shall be removed and disposed of in accordance with applicable federal, State, and local laws and rules.

All remediation plans shall require that the lead poisoning hazards be reduced to the following levels:

Fewer than 40 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on floors.

Fewer than 250 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on interior windowsills, bathtubs, kitchen sinks, and lavatories.

Fewer than 400 micrograms per square foot for lead dust on window troughs.

Fewer than 400 parts per million for lead in bare soil in play areas, gardens, pet sleeping areas, and areas within three feet of the residential housing unit or child-occupied facility. Lead in bare soil in other locations of the yard shall be reduced
to less than 1,200 parts per million.

Fewer than 10 parts per billion for lead in drinking water.

The Department shall verify by visual inspection that the approved remediation plan has been completed. The Department may also verify plan completion by residual lead dust monitoring and soil or drinking water lead level measurement.

(j1)
Compliance with the maintenance standard satisfies the remediation requirements for confirmed lead poisoning cases identified on or after 1 October 1990 as long as all lead poisoning hazards identified on interior
and exterior surfaces are addressed by remediation. Except for owner-occupied residential housing units, continued compliance shall be verified by means of an annual monitoring inspection conducted by the Department. For owner-occupied
residential housing units, continued compliance shall be verified (i) by means of an annual monitoring inspection, (ii) by documentation that no child less than six years of age and no pregnant woman has resided in or regularly
visited the residential housing unit within the past year, or (iii) by documentation that no child less than six years of age and no pregnant woman residing in or regularly visiting the unit has an elevated blood lead level.

Removal of children or pregnant women from the residential housing unit or removal of children from the child-occupied facility shall not constitute remediation if the property continues to be used for a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility.
The remediation requirements imposed in subsection (a) of this section apply so long as the property continues to be used as a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 1998-209, s. 3; 2003-150, s. 6; 2017-57, s. 11E.6(d); 2021-69, s. 2.

§ 130A-131.9D.
Effect of compliance with maintenance standard.

Any owner of a residential housing unit constructed prior to 1978 who is sued by a current or former occupant seeking damages for injuries allegedly arising from exposure to lead-based paint or lead-contaminated dust, shall not be deemed liable (i) for
any injuries sustained by that occupant after the owner first complied with the maintenance standard defined under

G.S. 130A-131.7

provided the owner has repeated the steps provided for in the maintenance standard annually for units in which children of less than six years of age have resided or regularly visited within the past year and obtained
a certificate of compliance under

G.S. 130A-131.9

E annually during such occupancy; or (ii) if the owner is able to show by other documentation that compliance with the maintenance standard has been maintained during the period when the injuries were sustained; or (iii)
if the owner is able to show that the unit was lead-safe housing containing no lead-based paint hazards during the period when the injuries were sustained.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 1998-209, s. 4.

§ 130A-131.9E.
Certificate of evidence of compliance.

An owner of a unit who has complied with the maintenance standard may apply annually to the Department for a certificate of compliance. Upon presentation of acceptable proof of compliance, the Department shall provide to the owner a certificate evidencing
compliance. The Department may issue a certificate based solely on information provided by the owner and may revoke the certificate upon showing that any of the information is erroneous or inadequate, or upon finding that the unit
is no longer in compliance with the maintenance standard.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b).

§ 130A-131.9F.
Discrimination in financing.

No bank or financial institution in the business of lending money for the purchase, sale, construction, rehabilitation, improvement, or refinancing of real property of the lending of money secured by an interest in real property may refuse to make such
loans merely because of the presence of lead-based paint on the residential real property or in the residential housing unit provided that the owner is in compliance with the maintenance standard and has obtained a certificate
of compliance under

G.S. 130A-131.9

E annually.

Nothing in this section shall (i) require a financial institution to extend a loan or otherwise provide financial assistance if it is clearly evident that health-related issues, other than those related to lead-based paint, made occupancy of the housing
accommodation an imminent threat to the health or safety of the occupant, or (ii) be construed to preclude a financial institution from considering the fair market value of the property which will secure the proposed loan.

Failure to meet the maintenance standard shall not be deemed a default under existing mortgages.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b).

§ 130A-131.9G.
Resident responsibilities.

In any residential housing unit occupied by a child less than six years of age or a pregnant woman who has an elevated blood lead level of five micrograms per deciliter or greater, the Department shall advise, in writing, the owner or managing agent and
the pregnant woman or the child’s parents or legal guardian of the importance of carrying out routine cleaning activities in the units they occupy, own, or manage. The cleaning activities shall include all of the following:

Wiping clean all windowsills with a damp cloth or sponge at least weekly.

Regularly washing all surfaces accessible to children.

In the case of a leased residential housing unit, identifying any deteriorated paint in the unit and notifying the owner or managing agent of the conditions within 72 hours of discovery.

Identifying and understanding potential lead poisoning hazards in the environment of each child less than six years of age and each pregnant woman in the unit (including toys, vinyl miniblinds, playground equipment, drinking water, soil, and painted surfaces),
and taking steps to prevent children and pregnant women from ingesting lead such as encouraging children and pregnant women to wash their faces and hands frequently and especially after playing outdoors.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 2003-150, s. 7; 2017-57, s. 11E.6(e).

§ 130A-131.9H.
Application fees for certificates of compliance.

The Department shall collect an application fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each certificate of compliance. Fee receipts shall be used to support the program that is developed to implement this Part. Fee receipts also may be used to provide for relocation
and medical expenses incurred by children with confirmed lead poisoning.

History.
1998-209, s. 5.

Part 5. Disposition of Remains of Terminated Pregnancies.

§ 130A-131.10.
Manner of disposition of remains of pregnancies.

The Commission for Public Health shall adopt rules to ensure that all facilities authorized to terminate pregnancies, and all medical or research laboratories or facilities to which the remains of terminated pregnancies are sent shall dispose of the remains
in a manner limited to burial, cremation, or, except as prohibited by subsection (b) of this section, approved hospital type of incineration.

A hospital or other medical facility or a medical or research laboratory or facility shall dispose of the remains of a recognizable fetus only by burial or cremation. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-265, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.

This section does not impose liability on a permitted medical waste treatment facility for a hospital’s or other medical facility’s violation of this section nor does it impose any additional duty on the treatment facility to inspect waste received from
the hospital or medical facility to determine compliance with this section.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the mother from donating the remains of her unborn child after a spontaneous abortion or miscarriage to a research facility for research or from acquiring the remains of the unborn child after a spontaneous abortion
or miscarriage. The mother’s informed written consent to allow research to be conducted upon the remains of the unborn child after a spontaneous abortion or miscarriage must be obtained prior to the donation and must be separate
from any other prior consent.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the performance of autopsies performed according to law, or any pathological examinations, chromosomal analyses, cultures, or any other examinations deemed necessary by attending pathologists or treating physicians
for diagnostic purposes.

History.
1989, c. 85; 1997-517, s. 4; 2007-182, s. 2; 2015-265, s. 1.

§§ 130A-131.11 through 130A-131.14.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Teen Pregnancy Prevention.

§ 130A-131.15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.89(b), effective July 1, 2001.

Cross References.

For Teen Pregnancy Prevention Initiatives, see

G.S. 130A-131.15

A.

§ 130A-131.15A.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer Teen Pregnancy Prevention Initiatives. The Department shall establish initiatives for primary prevention, secondary prevention, and special projects.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. The rules shall include a maximum annual funding level for initiatives and a requirement for local match.

Initiatives shall be funded in accordance with selection criteria established by the Commission. In funding initiatives, the Department shall target counties with the highest teen pregnancy rates, increasingly higher rates, high rates within demographic
subgroups, or greatest need for parenting programs. Grants shall be awarded on an annual basis.

Initiatives shall be funded on a four-year funding cycle. The Department may end funding prior to the end of the four-year period if programmatic requirements and performance standards are not met. At the end of four years of funding, a local initiative
shall be eligible to reapply for funding.

Administrative costs in implementing this section shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total funds administered pursuant to this section.

Programs are not required to provide a cash match for these funds; however, the Department may require an in-kind match.

The Department shall periodically evaluate the effectiveness of teen pregnancy prevention programs.

The Department’s use of State funds for initiatives and projects authorized under this section shall not include the allocation of funds to renew or extend existing contracts or enter into new contracts for the provision of family planning services, pregnancy
prevention activities, or adolescent parenting programs with any provider that performs abortions.

History.
2001-424, s. 21.89(c); 2015-265, s. 3.

§ 130A-131.16.
Birth defects monitoring program established; definitions.

The Birth Defects Monitoring Program is established within the State Center for Health and Environmental Statistics. The Birth Defects Monitoring Program shall compile, tabulate, and publish information related to the incidence and prevention of birth
defects.

As used in this Part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term:

“Birth defect” means any physical, functional, or chemical abnormality present at birth that is of possible genetic or prenatal origin.

“Program” means the Birth Defects Monitoring Program established under this Part.

Physicians and persons in charge of licensed medical facilities shall, upon request, permit staff of the Program to examine, review, and obtain a copy of any medical record in their possession or under their control that pertains to a diagnosed or suspected
birth defect, including the records of the mother.

A physician or person in charge of a licensed medical facility who permits examination, review, or copying of medical records pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed for providing
access to these medical records based upon invasion of privacy or breach of physician-patient confidentiality.

History.
1995, c. 268, s. 1.

§ 130A-131.17.
Confidentiality of information; research.

All information collected and analyzed by the Program pursuant to this Part shall be confidential insofar as the identity of the individual patient is concerned. This information shall not be considered public record open to inspection. Access to the
information shall be limited to Program staff authorized by the Director of the State Center for Health and Environmental Statistics. The Director of the State Center for Health and Environmental Statistics may also authorize access
to this information to persons engaged in demographic, epidemiological, or other similar scientific studies related to health. The Commission shall adopt rules that establish strict criteria for the use of monitoring Program information
for scientific research. All persons given authorized access to Program information shall agree, in writing, to maintain confidentiality.

All scientific research proposed to be conducted by persons other than authorized Program staff using the information from the Program, shall first be reviewed and approved by the Director of the State Center for Health and Environmental Statistics and
an appropriate committee for the protection of human subjects which is approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Satisfaction of the
terms of the Commission’s rules for data access shall entitle the researcher to obtain information from the Program and, if part of the research protocol, to contact case subjects.

Whenever authorized Program staff propose a research protocol that includes contacting case subjects, the Director of the State Center for Health and Environmental Statistics shall submit a protocol describing the research to the State Health Director
and to an appropriate committee for the protection of human subjects which is approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If and when
the protocol is approved by the committee and by the State Health Director pursuant to the rules of the Commission, then Program staff shall be entitled to complete the approved project and to contact case subjects.

The Program shall maintain a record of all persons who are given access to the information in the system. The record shall include the following:

The name of the person authorizing access;

The name, title, and organizational affiliation of persons given access;

The dates of access; and

The specific purposes for which information is to be used.

The record required under this subsection shall be open to public inspection during normal operating hours.

Nothing in this section prohibits the Program from publishing statistical compilations relating to birth defects that do not in any way identify individual patients.

History.
1995, c. 268, s. 1.

§§ 130A-131.18 through 130A-131.24.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Office of Women’s Health.

§ 130A-131.25.
Office of Women’s Health established.

There is established in the Department the Office of Women’s Health. The purpose of the office is to expand the State’s public health concerns and focus to include a comprehensive outlook on the overall health status of women. The primary goals of the
Office shall be the prevention of disease and improvement in the quality of life for women over their entire lifespan. The Department shall develop strategies for achieving these goals, which shall include but not be limited to:

Developing a strategic plan to improve public services and programs targeting women;

Conducting policy analyses on specific issues related to women’s health;

Facilitating communication among the Department’s programs and between the Department and external women’s health groups and community-based organizations;

Building public health awareness and capacity regarding women’s health issues by providing a series of services including evaluation, recommendation, technical assistance, and training; and

Developing initiatives for modification or expansion of women-oriented services with the intent of establishing meaningful public/private partnerships in the future.

The Office shall study the feasibility of establishing initiatives for:

Early intervention services for women infected with HIV; and

Outreach, treatment, and follow-up services to women at high risk for contracting sexually transmitted diseases.

In conducting the study the Department shall take into consideration related services already in place in the Department and at the local level.

History.
1997-172, s. 2.

§ 130A-131.30.
Healthy Out-of-School Program established.

There is created the “Healthy Out-of-School Time (HOST) Recognition Program” to be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, in collaboration with the North Carolina Center for Afterschool Programs based in
the Public School Forum.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(a).

§ 130A-131.31.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply in this Part:

Department. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health.

HEPA Standards. — The National Institute on Out-of-School Time Healthy Eating and Physical Activity Standards.

Out-of-school time program. — Any nonlicensed program provided to children and youth ages 17 and under that is currently exempt from

G.S. 110-91

or any other qualified out-of-school time programs that serve school-age children outside of regular school hours, including before school and on weekends.

Program attendee. — A person enrolled in an exempt out-of-school time program.

Screen time. — Time spent viewing or working on television, videos, computers, or handheld devices, with or without Internet access.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(b).

§ 130A-131.32.
Program development.

The Department shall develop a process, to be administered on its Internet Web site, for an out-of-school time program to be recognized as a program that meets the HEPA Standards as outlined in this section. The Web site shall include all resources and
links that an out-of-school time program may use to meet the requirements of this section. Programs being recognized shall demonstrate consistency and implementation of HEPA standards.

The Department shall develop and implement a process for providing minimal verification of self-assessments submitted by out-of-school time programs applying for recognition, which may include a site visit or other form of review. At a minimum, the Department
shall review a random sample of program self-assessments within 30 to 60 days of receipt of the assessments.

Periodically, or at least once every five years, the Department shall review, and if necessary, revise and update the program standards to reflect advancements in nutrition science, dietary data, and physical activity standards to ensure consistency with
nationally recognized guidelines for out-of-school time programs.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(c).

§ 130A-131.33.
Certificate; program information.

The Department shall provide a certificate to out-of-school time programs that demonstrate that the program meets HEPA standards. If the out-of-school time program is located on a school site, the out-of-school time program shall communicate with the
school regarding nutrition education and physical activity, as appropriate, to provide the program attendees with a complete educational experience. All activities shall also adhere to the local school administrative unit’s wellness
policy, as appropriate.

The Department shall have information about the program available for review by a parent at both the physical location of the out-of-school time program and on the program’s Internet Web site, if applicable. The Department shall require that the out-of-school
time program maintain in its records a document signed by all parents acknowledging that they are aware of the HOST Recognition Program requirements and policies to institute and reinforce these specific healthy behaviors for all
children served in the out-of-school time program.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(d).

§ 130A-131.34.
Certificate renewal.

A certificate issued under this Part shall be valid for one calendar year. An out-of-school time program that wishes to create a new certificate for the subsequent year shall, by January 1 of the following year and thereafter, verify with the Department
that the out-of-school time program continues to follow the HOST Recognition Program criteria established in accordance with

G.S. 130A-131.33

.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(e).

§ 130A-131.35.
List of programs.

The Department shall maintain and update a list of out-of-school time programs that qualify under the provisions of this Part and shall post that list on its Internet Web site, including the date of qualification for each program.

History.
2016-94, s. 12E.2(f).

§ 130A-132.

Reserved for future codification purposes.